Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-8,124
Act, how cited.

Sections 79-8,124 to 79-8,131 shall be known and may be cited as the Master Teacher Program Act.

Laws 2000, LB 1399, § 7.

Attracting Excellence to Teaching Program, see section 79-8,133.

Enhancing Excellence in Teaching Program, see section 79-8,137.01.